Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 2591.
Applications.

Applications for licensure shall be on forms provided by the Board.
Each application shall contain a statement under oath showing the applicant’s education, land surveying experience, and other pertinent information and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2592.
Licensure by examination.

Any person shall be eligible for licensure as a land surveyor if the person qualifies under one of the following provisions, as established by the Board by rule:

Bachelor’s degree in land surveying, internship, portfolio, and examination. A person who has graduated with a bachelor’s degree in land surveying from a program accredited by the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET), completed a 24-month internship, successfully completed a portfolio, and successfully completed the examinations required by the Board may be granted a license.

Associate’s degree in land surveying, internship, portfolio, and examination. A person who has graduated with an associate’s degree in land surveying from a program accredited by the ABET, completed a 36-month internship, successfully completed a portfolio, and successfully completed the examinations required by the Board may be granted a license.

Internship, portfolio, and examinations. An applicant who has completed a 72-month internship, successfully completed a portfolio, and passed the examinations required by the Board may be granted a license.

License examinations may consist of a national surveying examination selected by the Board plus a Vermont portion. The Vermont portion shall be limited to those subjects and skills necessary to perform land surveying.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1969, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 24, 1970;

1971, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2011, No. 66

, § 7, eff. June 1, 2011;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 31.

§ 2592a.
Licensure by endorsement.

Upon an applicant’s successful completion of the Vermont portion of the licensing examination, the Board may issue a license to an applicant who is licensed or registered and currently in good standing in a U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction having licensing requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter. The absence of a portfolio requirement in another jurisdiction shall not prevent the Board from finding substantial equivalence.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 2593.
Corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, associations; individual proprietorships; liability.

The right to practice land surveying is a personal right based on the qualities of the individual and evidenced by a nontransferable license.

A corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, or individual proprietorship may furnish land surveyor services provided a member or employee thereof is a licensed land surveyor and is in responsible charge of such surveys, and provided all land surveys are signed and stamped with the personal seal of the licensed land surveyor in responsible charge.

A corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, or individual proprietorship with which the land surveyor may practice shall be jointly and severally liable with the land surveyor for work performed.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 40

, § 13.

§ 2594.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 2595.
Exceptions.

The work of an employee or subordinate of a person having a license under this chapter is exempted from the licensing provisions of this chapter if such work is done under the supervision of and is verified by a licensee.

This chapter shall not be construed to apply to or to interfere with federal employees in the performance of their official duties.

This chapter shall not be construed to apply to or to interfere with State employees in the performance of their official duties, provided that the work is being done under the supervision of a licensed land surveyor.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 35

, § 41;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 34.

§ 2596.
Use of seal; certification.

Each licensed land surveyor shall procure a personal seal in a form approved by the Board. The surveyor shall affix the surveyor’s signature and seal together with a certification statement as to the nature of the survey work upon all completed maps, plats, surveys, or other documents before delivery thereof to any client or before any map, plat, survey, or other document is offered for filing at the office of the town clerk or any other proper authority. The certification statement shall clearly set forth what information was used as the basis of the survey and shall indicate that the survey work identified thereon is consistent with this information.

Use of the seal for stamping or sealing documents after the corresponding certificate of licensure has expired or has been suspended or revoked unless the certificate has been renewed or reissued shall be unlawful.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2597.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application $200.00 (2) Biennial renewal of license $300.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1971, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 58;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 38b;

1997, No. 59

, § 58, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 179;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2015, No. 57

, § 4.

§ 2598.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct is the conduct prohibited by this section and by

3 V.S.A. § 129a

.

Unprofessional conduct includes the following actions by a licensee:

practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law;

accepting and performing responsibilities that the licensee knows or has reason to know that he or she is not competent to perform;

making any material misrepresentation with respect to the qualifications of or experience of an applicant or otherwise in the practice of the profession, whether by commission or omission;

[Repealed.]

willfully acting, while serving as a Board member, in any way to contravene the provisions of this chapter and thereby artificially restrict the entry of qualified persons into the profession;

using the licensee’s seal on documents prepared by others not in the licensee’s direct supervision, or using the seal of another.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1971, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 38c;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 47;

2011, No. 66

, § 7, eff. June 1, 2011;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 35.

§ 2599.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 36.

§ 2600.
Repealed.
1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 92.

§ 2601.
Renewals.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the renewal fee following the procedure established by the Office of Professional Regulation.

[Repealed.]

A license that has lapsed for a period of three years or less may be renewed upon application and payment of the renewal fee and the late penalty fee.

As a condition of renewal, the Board shall require that a licensee establish that he or she has completed continuing education, as approved by the Board not to exceed 15 hours for each year of renewal.

The Board may renew the license of an individual whose license has lapsed for more than three years upon payment of the required fee and the late renewal penalty, provided the individual has satisfied all the requirements for renewal established by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.

§ 2602.
Expired. 1997, No. 77 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, as amended by 1999, No. 52, § 42.